District of Columbia statutes.
28-4552

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Affected party” means any person directly or indirectly affected by excessive prices of patented prescription drugs, including any organization representing such persons or any person or organization representing the public interest.

(2)

“High income country” means the United Kingdom, Germany, Canada, or Australia.

History

Dec. 10, 2005, D.C. Law 16-37, § 2, 52 DCR 9061